Illinois, session 104th, HB1637.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Motor Fuel Tax Law is amended by changing 5Section 2 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 505/2)  (from Ch. 120, par. 418)7    Sec. 2. A tax is imposed on the privilege of operating 8motor vehicles upon the public highways and recreational-type 9watercraft upon the waters of this State.10    (a) Prior to August 1, 1989, the tax is imposed at the rate 11of 13 cents per gallon on all motor fuel used in motor vehicles 12operating on the public highways and recreational type 13watercraft operating upon the waters of this State. Beginning 14on August 1, 1989 and until January 1, 1990, the rate of the 15tax imposed in this paragraph shall be 16 cents per gallon. 16Beginning January 1, 1990 and until July 1, 2019, the rate of 17tax imposed in this paragraph, including the tax on compressed 18natural gas, shall be 19 cents per gallon. Beginning July 1, 192019 and until July 1, 2020, the rate of tax imposed in this 20paragraph shall be 38 cents per gallon. Beginning July 1, 2020 21and until July 1, 2021, the rate of tax imposed in this 22paragraph shall be 38.7 cents per gallon. Beginning July 1, 232021 and until January 1, 2023, the rate of tax imposed in this   HB1637- 2 -LRB104 07466 HLH 17507 b1paragraph shall be 39.2 cents per gallon. On January 1, 2023, 2the rate of tax imposed in this paragraph shall be increased by 3an amount equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the 4Consumer Price Index for the 12 months ending in September of 52022. On July 1, 2023, and on July 1 of each subsequent year, 6except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the rate of 7tax imposed in this paragraph shall be increased by an amount 8equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer 9Price Index for the 12 months ending in March of the year in 10which the increase takes place. The percentage increase in the 11Consumer Price Index shall be calculated as follows: (1) 12calculate the average Consumer Price Index for the full 12 13months ending in March of the year in which the increase takes 14place; (2) calculate the average Consumer Price Index for the 15full 12 months ending in March of the year immediately 16preceding the year in which the increase takes place; (3) 17calculate the percentage increase, if any, in the current-year 18average determined under item (1) over the preceding-year 19average determined under item (2). The rate shall be rounded 20to the nearest one-tenth of one cent. Notwithstanding the 21provisions of this Section, the increase described in this 22subsection based on the Consumer Price Index shall not occur 23from July 1, 2025 until July 1, 2027. 24    (a-5) Beginning on July 1, 2022 and through December 31, 252022, each retailer of motor fuel shall cause the following 26notice to be posted in a prominently visible place on each   HB1637- 3 -LRB104 07466 HLH 17507 b1retail dispensing device that is used to dispense motor fuel 2in the State of Illinois: "As of July 1, 2022, the State of 3Illinois has suspended the inflation adjustment to the motor 4fuel tax through December 31, 2022. The price on this pump 5should reflect the suspension of the tax increase." The notice 6shall be printed in bold print on a sign that is no smaller 7than 4 inches by 8 inches. The sign shall be clearly visible to 8customers. Any retailer who fails to post or maintain a 9required sign through December 31, 2022 is guilty of a petty 10offense for which the fine shall be $500 per day per each 11retail premises where a violation occurs. 12    (b) Until July 1, 2019, the tax on the privilege of 13operating motor vehicles which use diesel fuel, liquefied 14natural gas, or propane shall be the rate according to 15paragraph (a) plus an additional 2 1/2 cents per gallon. 16Beginning July 1, 2019, the tax on the privilege of operating 17motor vehicles which use diesel fuel, liquefied natural gas, 18or propane shall be the rate according to subsection (a) plus 19an additional 7.5 cents per gallon. "Diesel fuel" is defined 20as any product intended for use or offered for sale as a fuel 21for engines in which the fuel is injected into the combustion 22chamber and ignited by pressure without electric spark.23    (c) A tax is imposed upon the privilege of engaging in the 24business of selling motor fuel as a retailer or reseller on all 25motor fuel used in motor vehicles operating on the public 26highways and recreational type watercraft operating upon the   HB1637- 4 -LRB104 07466 HLH 17507 b1waters of this State: (1) at the rate of 3 cents per gallon on 2motor fuel owned or possessed by such retailer or reseller at 312:01 a.m. on August 1, 1989; and (2) at the rate of 3 cents 4per gallon on motor fuel owned or possessed by such retailer or 5reseller at 12:01 A.M. on January 1, 1990.6    Retailers and resellers who are subject to this additional 7tax shall be required to inventory such motor fuel and pay this 8additional tax in a manner prescribed by the Department of 9Revenue.10    The tax imposed in this paragraph (c) shall be in addition 11to all other taxes imposed by the State of Illinois or any unit 12of local government in this State.13    (d) Except as provided in Section 2a, the collection of a 14tax based on gallonage of gasoline used for the propulsion of 15any aircraft is prohibited on and after October 1, 1979, and 16the collection of a tax based on gallonage of special fuel used 17for the propulsion of any aircraft is prohibited on and after 18December 1, 2019.19    (e) The collection of a tax, based on gallonage of all 20products commonly or commercially known or sold as 1-K 21kerosene, regardless of its classification or uses, is 22prohibited (i) on and after July 1, 1992 until December 31, 231999, except when the 1-K kerosene is either: (1) delivered 24into bulk storage facilities of a bulk user, or (2) delivered 25directly into the fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles and (ii) 26on and after January 1, 2000. Beginning on January 1, 2000, the   HB1637- 5 -LRB104 07466 HLH 17507 b1collection of a tax, based on gallonage of all products 2commonly or commercially known or sold as 1-K kerosene, 3regardless of its classification or uses, is prohibited except 4when the 1-K kerosene is delivered directly into a storage 5tank that is located at a facility that has withdrawal 6facilities that are readily accessible to and are capable of 7dispensing 1-K kerosene into the fuel supply tanks of motor 8vehicles. For purposes of this subsection (e), a facility is 9considered to have withdrawal facilities that are not "readily 10accessible to and capable of dispensing 1-K kerosene into the 11fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles" only if the 1-K kerosene 12is delivered from: (i) a dispenser hose that is short enough so 13that it will not reach the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle 14or (ii) a dispenser that is enclosed by a fence or other 15physical barrier so that a vehicle cannot pull alongside the 16dispenser to permit fueling. 17    Any person who sells or uses 1-K kerosene for use in motor 18vehicles upon which the tax imposed by this Law has not been 19paid shall be liable for any tax due on the sales or use of 1-K 20kerosene.21    As used in this Section, "Consumer Price Index" means the 22index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 23United States Department of Labor that measures the average 24change in prices of goods and services purchased by all urban 25consumers, United States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 26100.   HB1637- 6 -LRB104 07466 HLH 17507 b1(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.